Hawaii statutes.
§166-10 Agricultural park special fund.
(a) There is created in the state treasury a special fund to be designated as
the agricultural park special fund. The proceeds in the fund shall be used for
the following purposes:

(1) Payment of agricultural park lease rents of
privately owned lands under lease to the State pursuant to sections 171-112 and
166-3;

(2) Establishing, operating, maintaining, and
improving infrastructure improvements in agricultural parks designated by the
department pursuant to section 166-3; and

(3) Any other purposes deemed necessary by the
department for the purpose of maintaining and operating those agricultural
parks and related facilities designated by the department pursuant to section
166-3.

For the purpose of paragraph (2),
infrastructure improvements may include, but shall not be limited to:
irrigation water system projects, wind power or hydro power and pumping
systems, waste disposal systems, domestic water systems, roads, street lights,
land and roads drainage, and bridges.

(b) Moneys appropriated for the purpose of the
fund; any other provision of the law to the contrary notwithstanding, all
moneys received or collected from an agricultural park project designated
pursuant to section 166-3, including residential and agricultural lot lease
rents; and all money collected or received by the department for the use and
maintenance of domestic and irrigation water systems within an agricultural
park and other systems enumerated in subsection (a) shall be deposited into the
agricultural park special fund. All interest earned or accrued on moneys
deposited in the fund shall become a part of the fund. Moneys in the fund
shall be expended upon warrants drawn by the comptroller. [L 1986, c 222, pt of
§1; am L 1990, c 52, §7]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next